Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2305
Procedures, rules, and regulations.

Each state university,
state college, or community college shall adopt the procedures, rules, and
regulations necessary to carry out the In the Line of Duty Dependent Education
Act.

Laws 2009, LB206, § 5.